tr: Davul derisi kullanım amacı (vuruş/rezonans): Vurma (üst); Çift amaçlı; Rezonans / trampet tarafı (alt); Diğer
ja: ドラムヘッド適用（打音／レゾナント）: 打面 (トップ); 兼用; 共鳴面/スネアサイド (ボトム); その他
hu: Dobfej felhelyezése (ütő-/rezonáns): Ütőbőr (felső); Kettős célú; Rezonáns / pergőoldali (alsó); Egyéb
de: Einsatzbereich des Trommelfells (Schlagfell/Resonanzfell): Schlagfell (oben); Doppelzweck; Resonanz- / Snare-Seite (Unten); Sonstige
pl: Zastosowanie naciągu perkusyjnego (uderzeniowy/rezonansowy): Uderzany (górny); Dwufunkcyjny; Rezonansowy / sprężynowy (dolny); Inne
th: หนังกลองสำหรับตำแหน่งติดตั้ง (ด้านตี/ด้านล่างระบายเสียง): ด้านตี (บน); อเนกประสงค์; ด้านสะท้อนเสียง / ด้านสแนร์ (ล่าง); อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Aplicação para cabeça/pele do tambor (bateria/ressonância): Batedeira (superior); Dupla função; Resposta / lado da esteira (inferior); Outros
pt-PT: Aplicação para pele de bateria (bateria/ressonância): Batedeira (superior); Dupla finalidade; Ressonante/lado da tarola (inferior); Outro
ko: 드럼 헤드 용도(타격면/공명면): 배터(상단); 겸용; 레조넌트/스네어 사이드(하단); 기타
zh-CN: 鼓皮应用（击打面/共鸣面）: 打击面（顶部）; 双重用途; 共鸣面/响弦侧（底部）; 其他
ro-RO: Utilizarea membranei tobei (pentru lovire/pentru rezonanță): Bătaie (partea superioară); Cu dublu rol; Rezonant / pentru premier (partea inferioară); Altele
it: Applicazione per pelli di tamburo (battente/risonante): Battente (superiore); A doppio scopo; Risonante / lato rullante (inferiore); Altra
nb: Trommeskinn-app (batter/resonant): Slagskinn (topp); Flerbruk; Resonans / seideside (bunn); Annet
hr-HR: Aplikacija glave bubnja (udarač/rezonantna): Udarna (gornja); Dvostruka namjena; Rezonantna / za mali bubanj (donja); Ostalo
bg-BG: Предназначение на мембраната за барабан (ударна/резонансна): Ударна (горна); С двойно предназначение; Резонантна / откъм пружината (долна); Друго
zh-TW: 鼓皮用途（打擊面/共鳴面）: 打擊面 (頂部); 雙用途; 共鳴面 / 響弦面 (底部); 其他
sl-SI: Namembnost opne bobna (udarna/resonančna): Udarna opna (zgornja); Večnamenska; Resonančna/mali boben (spodnja); Drugo
sv: Trumskinnets användningsområde (slag/resonans): Slagskinn (överdel); Kombinerad användning; Resonans/sejarsida (underdel); Övrigt
es: Aplicación para parches de tambor (superior/inferior): Batidor (superior); Doble propósito; Resonante/lado de la bordonera (inferior); Otro
cs: Aplikace bubnové hlavy (plátkové/rezonanční): Hrací (horní); Dvojí účel; Rezonanční / spodní (struníková); Jiné
sk-SK: Použitie blany bubna (úderová/rezonančná): Úderová (vrchná); Dvojúčelová; Rezonančná / rytmičáková (spodná); Iné
vi: Ứng dụng mặt trống (mặt đánh/mặt cộng hưởng): Mặt gõ (trên); Đa mục đích; Mặt cộng hưởng / mặt dưới bẫy âm (dưới); Khác
da: Montering af trommeskind (anslagssiden/resonanssiden): Slagskind (top); Dobbelt formål; Resonans / seiding-side (bund); Andet
fr: Application de peau de batterie (battante/résonante): Frappe (dessus); Double usage; Résonance / côté timbre (dessous); Autre
el: Εφαρμογή κεφαλής τυμπάνου (χτύπημα/αντήχηση): Κρούσης (πάνω); Διπλής χρήσης; Συντονισμού / πλευρά ταμπούρου (κάτω); Άλλο
lt-LT: Būgno membranos paskirtis (mušamoji / rezonansinė): Viršutinis (mušamasis); Dvejopos paskirties; Rezonansinis / spyruoklės pusės (apatinis); Kita
nl: Drumvel toepassing (slagvel/resonantievel): Slagvel (boven); Voor dubbel gebruik; Resonantievel / snarenkant (onder); Overige
fi: Rumpukalvon käyttötapa (soitto/resonanssi): Lyöntikalvo (päällä); Kaksikäyttöinen; Resonanssikalvo / alakalvo (alla); Muu
en: Drum head application (batter/resonant): Batter (top); Dual-purpose; Resonant / snare-side (bottom); Other
ru: Назначение барабанной кожи (ударная/резонансная): Ударная (верхняя); Двойного назначения; Резонансная/подструнная (нижняя); Другое